Montana, session 2025, HB423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-2-220, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-2-220. Maintenance of active and inactive voter registration lists for elections -- rules by
secretary of state. (1) The rules adopted by the secretary of state under 13-2-108 must include the following
procedures, at least one of which an election administrator shall follow annually:
(a) compare the entire list of registered electors, including electors on the absentee ballot list,
against the national change of address files and provide appropriate confirmation notice to those individuals
whose addresses have apparently changed;
(b) mail a nonforwardable, first-class, "return if undeliverable--address correction requested" notice
to all registered electors, including electors on the absentee ballot list, of each jurisdiction to confirm their
addresses and provide the appropriate confirmation notice to those individuals who return the notices;
(c) mail a targeted mailing to electors, including electors on the absentee ballot list, who failed to
vote in the preceding federal general election, and to applicants who failed to provide required information on
registration forms, and provisionally registered electors by:
(i) sending the list of nonvoters a nonforwardable notice, followed by the appropriate forwardable
confirmation notice to those electors who appear to have moved from their addresses of record;
(ii) comparing the list of nonvoters against the national change of address files, followed by the
appropriate confirmation notices to those electors who appear to have moved from their addresses of record;
(iii) sending forwardable confirmation notices; or
(iv) making a door-to-door canvass.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 423
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 423
(2) (a) Any notices returned as undeliverable to the election administrator or any notices to which
the elector fails to respond after the election administrator uses the procedures provided in subsection (1) must
be followed within 30 days by an appropriate confirmation notice that is a forwardable, first-class, postage-paid,
self-addressed, return notice.
(b) If the elector fails to respond within 30 days of the final confirmation notice, after the 30th day,
the election administrator shall move the elector to the inactive list and work with the secretary of state's office
and the motor vehicle division in the department of justice to verify the elector's address.
(c) If the election administrator is not able to verify the elector's address, the elector must be
placed on the inactive list until they follow the procedure in 13-2-222 or 13-2-304, as applicable.
(3) A procedure used by an election administrator pursuant to this section must be completed at
least 90 days before a primary or general election for federal office.
(4) An elector's registration may be reactivated pursuant to 13-2-222 or may be canceled pursuant
to 13-2-402.
(5) The secretary of state shall adopt rules to maintain applicants, including removing provisionally
registered electors."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 423
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 423, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 423
INTRODUCED BY K. LOVE
AN ACT REVISING ELECTION LAWS RELATED TO THE MAINTENANCE OF VOTER REGISTRATION LISTS;
AMENDING SECTION 13-2-220, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”